District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-942.01

Imposition of civil fines, penalties, and fees; adjudications.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1940, ch. 397, § 42a
as added Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 448(e), 32 DCR 4450
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-942.01.
1981 Ed., § 29-1148.